Maine, session 132, LD682.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1596, sub-§2, as repealed and replaced by PL 2023, c. 416, §1,
is repealed and the following enacted in its place:
2. Abortion reports. A report of each abortion performed must be made to the
department on forms prescribed by the department. These report forms may not identify
the patient by name or include other identifying information except as provided in this
subsection and must include only the information prescribed by the National Association
for Public Health Statistics and Information Systems, Technical Resource for Reporting
Induced Termination of Pregnancy, dated December 3, 2019, referred to in this subsection
as "the standard report form," or any more recent revision of the standard report form.
The report must include, without limitation, the following information:
A. The date and place the abortion was performed;
B. The age, race, marital status and level of education of the person on whom the
abortion was performed;
C. The method used to perform the abortion;
D. The gestational age of the fetus when the abortion was performed; and
E. Any other information required by the standard report form.
The report containing the information and data required by this subsection must be
transmitted by a health care professional to the department not later than 10 days following
the end of the month in which the abortion was performed.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §1598, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 416, §2, is further
amended to read:
1. Policy. It is the public policy of the State that the State not restrict a woman's
exercise of her private decision to terminate a pregnancy before viability except as provided
in this section and section 1597‑A. It is also the public policy of the State that all abortions
may be performed only by a health care professional, as defined in section 1596, subsection
1, paragraph C.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §1598, sub-§1-B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 416, §3 and
reallocated by RR 2023, c. 1, Pt. A, §8, is amended to read:
1-B. Abortion after viability. After viability, an abortion may be performed only
when it is medically necessary to preserve the life or health of the mother or, in the
professional judgment of a physician licensed pursuant to Title 32, chapter 36 or 48, the
fetus is diagnosed with a lethal fetal anomaly. The physician shall apply the applicable
standard of care in making a professional judgment under this subsection. For purposes of
this subsection, "lethal fetal anomaly" means a fetal condition diagnosed before birth that,
if the pregnancy results in a live birth, will, with reasonable certainty, result in the death of
the child not more than 3 months after birth.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §1598, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 416, §4, is further
amended to read:
A. Only a person licensed under Title 32, chapter 36 or 48 to practice in the State as
an osteopathic or medical physician or physician assistant or a person licensed under
Page 1 - 132LR0674(01)

412 Title 32, chapter 31 to practice in the State as an advanced practice registered nurse
423 may perform an abortion on another person. Nothing in this paragraph limits the
434 applicability of Title 32, section 3270 or any other civil or criminal law that may apply.
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §1598, sub-§3, ¶B, as repealed by PL 2023, c. 416, §4, is
reenacted to read:
B. Any person not so licensed who knowingly performs an abortion on another person
or any person who knowingly assists a nonlicensed person to perform an abortion on
another person is guilty of a Class C crime.
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §1598, sub-§4, as repealed by PL 2023, c. 416, §5, is reenacted
to read:
4. Abortions after viability; criminal liability. A person who performs an abortion
after viability is guilty of a Class D crime if:
A. The person knowingly disregarded the viability of the fetus; and
B. The person knew that the abortion was not necessary for the preservation of the life
or health of the mother.